Maryland, session 2026, SB0367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–507.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN WICOMICO COUNTY.
(B) IN THIS SECTION, “INHERENTLY DANGEROUS” MEANS POSING A
SERIOUS RISK OF INJURY TO A PEDESTRIAN, A DRIVER OR PASSENGER IN A VEHICLE,
OR OTHER PERSONS THAT CANNOT BE MITIGATED WITH THE EXERCISE OF
ORDINARY CARE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0367*

SENATE BILL 367
(C) A PERSON MAY NOT STAND IN A ROADWAY, SHOULDER, MEDIAN
DIVIDER, OR INTERSECTION DETERMINED BY THE COUNTY OR A MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION IN THE COUNTY TO BE INHERENTLY DANGEROUS.
(D) A POLICE OFFICER MAY NOT ISSUE A CITATION FOR A VIOLATION OF
THIS SECTION UNLESS:
(1) THE INHERENTLY DANGEROUS ROADWAY, SHOULDER, MEDIAN
DIVIDER, OR INTERSECTION HAS APPROPRIATE SIGNS INSTALLED THAT NOTIFY THE
PUBLIC THAT A PERSON MAY NOT STAND IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) THE SIGNS ARE INSTALLED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MANUAL
AND SPECIFICATIONS FOR A UNIFORM SYSTEM OF TRAFFIC CONTROL DEVICES
ADOPTED BY THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION UNDER § 25–104 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.